Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.030

Recognizance of defendant.

The sheriff shall require the defendant to enter into a bond, with sufficient surety, personally to appear within the time allowed by law for answering the complaint, and to abide the order of the court; and in default thereof the defendant shall be committed to prison until discharged in due course of law; such special bail shall be liable for the principal, and shall have a right to arrest and deliver him or her up, as in other cases, and the defendant may give other bail.

[ 2011 c 336 s 208; 1891 c 42 s 3; Code 1881 s 638; 1877 p 133 s 641; 1869 p 149 s 578; 1854 p 209 s 420; RRS s 780, part. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 639; 1877 p 133 s 642; 1869 p 150 s 579; 1854 p 209 s 421 now codified as RCW 7.44.031.]